Hawaii statutes.
[§346-371] Annual performance audits. [Section
effective until June 30, 2017. For section effective July 1, 2017, see below.]
(a) The department shall require any provider agency that dispensed shelter
or assistance for any homeless facility or any other program for the homeless
authorized by this part to submit to the department a financial audit and
report when requested, but no later than every three years. The audit shall be
conducted by a certified public accounting firm. This audit and report shall
contain information specific to the funds received under state homeless program
contracts. The audit shall include recommendations to address any problems
found.

(b) Continuing contracts with provider
agencies to participate in any program for the homeless authorized by this part
shall require that the provider agency address the recommendations made by the
auditing agency, subject to exceptions as set by the department.

(c) Failure to carry out the recommendations
made by the auditing agency may be grounds for the department to bar a provider
agency from further contracts for programs authorized by this part until the
barred provider has addressed all deficiencies. [L 2010, c 89, pt of §2]

§346-371 Annual financial audit. [Section
effective July 1, 2017. For section effective until June 30, 2017, see above.]
(a) The department shall require any provider agency that dispensed shelter or
assistance for any homeless facility or any other program for the homeless
authorized by this part to submit to the department a financial audit when
requested, but at least annually. The audit shall be conducted by a certified
public accounting firm. This audit shall contain information specific to the
funds received under state homeless program contracts. The audit shall include
recommendations to address any problems found.

(b) Continuing contracts with provider
agencies to participate in any program for the homeless authorized by this part
shall require that the provider agency address the recommendations made by the
audit, subject to exceptions as set by the department.

(c) Failure to carry out the recommendations
made by the audit may be grounds for the department to bar a provider agency
from further contracts for programs authorized by this part until the barred
provider has addressed all deficiencies. [L 2010, c 89, pt of §2; am L 2016, c
234; §4]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next